apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="lede/s__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vederfar/es__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sl/åss__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>åss</l>       <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>åss</l>       <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åss</l>       <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åss</l>       <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oss</l>       <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vem/mes__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>mes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>mes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>mes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>mes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>mes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dr/ages__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>ages</l>      <r>ages<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>ages</l>      <r>ages<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ages</l>      <r>ages<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ages</l>      <r>ages<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oges</l>      <r>ages<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ten/nes__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>nes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>nes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>nes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>nes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>nes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dr/as__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogs</l>       <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>os</l>        <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nevet/akes__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>akes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>akes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>akes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>akes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oks</l>       <r>akes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>okes</l>      <r>akes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tr/ives__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivdes</l>     <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ivs</l>       <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ivs</l>       <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivdes</l>     <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ivedes</l>    <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eivs</l>      <r>ives<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tr/effes__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>effes</l>     <r>effes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>effes</l>     <r>effes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eftes</l>     <r>effes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>effes</l>     <r>effes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eftes</l>     <r>effes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kiv/es__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gj/ørs__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ørs</l>       <r>ørs<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ors</l>       <r>ørs<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bøyes">           <i>bøye</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="lykkes">   <i>lykke</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="mislykkes"><i>mislykke</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forstenes">           <i>forstene</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grønnes">           <i>grønne</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vantrives">       <i>vantr</i><par n="tr/ives__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trives">          <i>tr</i><par n="tr/ives__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oppleves">        <i>opplev</i><par n="kiv/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kreves">        <i>krev</i><par n="kiv/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arves">           <i>arve</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nedarves">        <i>nedarve</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tennes">          <i>ten</i><par n="ten/nes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aldres">          <i>aldre</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blues">           <i>blue</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blyges">          <i>blyg</i><par n="kiv/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dages">           <i>dage</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drages">          <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ages__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dras">            <i>dr</i><par n="dr/as__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eldes">           <i>elde</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meldes">           <i>melde</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="innmeldes">           <i>innmelde</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fattes">          <i>fatte</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="foreldes">        <i>forelde</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gantes">          <i>gante</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gjørs">           <i>gj</i><par n="gj/ørs__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hanskes">         <i>hanske</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kives">           <i>kiv</i><par n="kiv/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ledes">           <i>lede</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mistrives">       <i>mistr</i><par n="tr/ives__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="modnes">          <i>modne</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nevetakes">       <i>nevet</i><par n="nevet/akes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slåss">           <i>sl</i><par n="sl/åss__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stortrives">      <i>stortr</i><par n="tr/ives__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="treffes">         <i>tr</i><par n="tr/effes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vederfares">      <i>vederfar</i><par n="vederfar/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erfares">      <i>erfar</i><par n="vederfar/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vemmes">          <i>vem</i><par n="vem/mes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="glemmes">         <i>glem</i><par n="vem/mes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forgubbes">       <i>forgubbe</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="veltes">          <i>velte</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="somres">          <i>somre</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vintres">         <i>vintre</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="handtakes">	<i>handt</i>	<par n="nevet/akes__vblex"/> </e>
<e lm="flokkes">	<i>flokke</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gremmes">	<i>gremme</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="håndtakes">	<par n="hånd"/><i>t</i><par n="nevet/akes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nøyes">	<i>nøy</i><par n="kiv/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="behøves">           <i>behøv</i>            <par n="kiv/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="harmes">                 <i>harme</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kjeftes">                <i>kjefte</i><par n="lede/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="illtrives">              <i>illtr</i><par n="tr/ives__vblex"/></e>
